Illinois, session 104th, SB1858.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4Article 1. 5    Section 1-1. Short title. This Article may be cited as the 6Privacy of Criminal Justice Data Act. References in this 7Article to "this Act" mean this Article.  8    Section 1-5. Definitions. In this Act:9    "Civil immigration enforcement" means the enforcement of a 10civil immigration warrant issued by an immigration judge who 11is not appointed under Article III of the United States 12Constitution but who is appointed as an administrative judge 13by the United States Attorney General pursuant to the federal 14Immigration and Nationality Act.15    "Civil immigration warrant" means any document that is not 16approved or ordered by a judge that can form the basis for an 17individual's arrest or detention for a civil immigration 18enforcement purpose. "Civil immigration warrant" includes Form 19I-200 "Warrant for the Arrest of Alien", Form I-203 "Order to 20Detain or Release Alien", Form I-205 "Warrant of 21Removal/Deportation", Form I-286 "Notice of Custody 22Determination", any predecessor or successor form, and all   SB1858- 2 -LRB104 09574 RLC 19637 b1warrants, hits, or requests contained in the "Immigration 2Violator File" of the FBI's National Crime Information Center 3(NCIC) database. "Civil immigration warrant" does not include 4any criminal warrant.5    "Contractor" means any person having a contract with a 6State agency or unit of local government.7    "Criminal justice data" means the information described in 8Sections 2, 2.1, and 4.5 of the Criminal Identification Act 9and includes criminal history record information as defined in 10Section 3 of the Illinois Uniform Conviction Information Act. 11    Section 1-10. Criminal justice data; no sharing with U.S. 12Immigration and Customs Enforcement or for civil immigration 13enforcement purposes. Each contractor or business that stores, 14maintains, or purchases criminal justice data for and from a 15State agency or unit of local government shall certify in the 16contract, under penalty of perjury, that the contractor or 17business will not share that data with U.S. Immigration and 18Customs Enforcement or for civil immigration enforcement 19purposes. 20Article 5.  21    Section 5-1. Short title. This Article may be cited as the 22Criminal Justice Information Sharing Act. References in this 23Article to "this Act" mean this Article.    SB1858- 3 -LRB104 09574 RLC 19637 b1    Section 5-5. Criminal justice information; prohibited 2sharing with Immigration and Customs Enforcement (ICE). 3    (a) In this Act:4    "Civil immigration enforcement" means the enforcement of a 5civil immigration warrant issued by an immigration judge who 6is not appointed under Article III of the United States 7Constitution but who is appointed as an administrative judge 8by the United States Attorney General pursuant to the federal 9Immigration and Nationality Act.10    "Civil immigration warrant" means any document that is not 11approved or ordered by a judge that can form the basis for an 12individual's arrest or detention for a civil immigration 13enforcement purpose. "Civil immigration warrant" includes Form 14I-200 "Warrant for the Arrest of Alien", Form I-203 "Order to 15Detain or Release Alien", Form I-205 "Warrant of 16Removal/Deportation", Form I-286 "Notice of Custody 17Determination", any predecessor or successor form, and all 18warrants, hits, or requests contained in the "Immigration 19Violator File" of the FBI's National Crime Information Center 20(NCIC) database. "Civil immigration warrant" does not include 21any criminal warrant.22    "Criminal history record information" means data 23identifiable to an individual, including information collected 24under Section 4.5 of the Criminal Identification Act, and 25consisting of descriptions or notations of arrests,   SB1858- 4 -LRB104 09574 RLC 19637 b1detentions, indictments, informations, pre-trial proceedings, 2trials, or other formal events in the criminal justice system 3or descriptions or notations of criminal charges (including 4criminal violations of local municipal ordinances) and the 5nature of any disposition arising therefrom, including 6sentencing, court or correctional supervision, rehabilitation, 7and release. The term does not apply to statistical records 8and reports in which individuals are not identified and from 9which their identities are not ascertainable, or to 10information that is for criminal investigative or intelligence 11purposes.12    "Criminal justice information" means any and every type of 13information that is collected, transmitted, or maintained by 14the criminal justice system, including criminal history record 15information.16    (b) Every contract with this State or a unit of local 17government to store, maintain, or purchase criminal justice 18information of this State or a unit of local government shall 19contain a provision in which the contractor certifies that it 20shall not share the criminal justice information with 21Immigration and Customs Enforcement (ICE) or for civil 22immigration enforcement purposes.